Hawaii statutes.
§431:9C-104 Duties of insurers. (a)
An insurer shall have on file an independent financial examination in a form
acceptable to the commissioner of each managing general agent with whom it has
done business.

(b) If a managing general agent establishes
loss reserves, the insurer shall annually obtain the opinion of an independent
actuary attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses
incurred and outstanding on business produced by the managing general agent.
The opinion required by this subsection shall be in addition to any other
required loss reserve certification required by this chapter.

(c) The insurer shall conduct at least
semiannually an on-site review of the underwriting and claims processing
operations of the managing general agent.

(d) Binding authority for all reinsurance
contracts or participation in insurance or reinsurance syndicates shall rest
with an officer of the insurer, who shall not be affiliated with the managing
general agent.

(e) The insurer shall notify the commissioner
in writing within thirty days of entering into or terminating a contract with a
managing general agent. Notice of the appointment of a managing general agent
shall include a statement of the duties that the managing general agent is expected
to perform on behalf of the insurer, the lines of insurance for which the
managing general agent shall be authorized to act, and any other information
the commissioner may require.

(f) An insurer shall review its books and
records each quarter to determine if any producer has become a managing general
agent of the insurer. If the insurer determines that a producer has become a
managing general agent of the insurer, the insurer shall promptly notify the
producer and the commissioner and the insurer and producer shall both fully
comply with this article within thirty days.

(g) An insurer shall not appoint to its board
of directors an officer, director, employee, subagent, or controlling
shareholder of any of its managing general agents; provided that this
subsection shall not apply to relationships governed by article 11.

(h) The insurer shall keep the bond and the
errors and omissions policy required by section 431:9C-103 on file for review
by the commissioner or other applicable regulatory agency. [L 2002, c 155, pt
of §2; am L 2010, c 116, §1(12)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next